Wyoming, session 2026, SF0096.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 14-3-301(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xii), 14-3-302(c), 39-18-101(a)(v)(D) and by
creating new paragraphs (xii) through (xv),
39-18-103(a)(intro) and (iii) through (v), (c)(iii) through
SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
(v), 39-18-104(c) through (e) and (g) and 39-18-106(a) are
amended to read:

14-3-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(xii) "Wholesaler" means as defined in W.S.
39-18-101(a)(v).

14-3-302. Prohibited sales or delivery.

(c) No retailer or wholesaler shall sell, permit the
sale, offer for sale, give away or deliver nicotine
products to any person under the age of twenty-one (21)
years.

39-18-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(v) "Wholesaler" means any person who:

SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
(D) Is a remote retail seller or who
otherwise sells or distributes for sale or resale
cigarettes over the internet or through any other means of
direct or indirect mail solicitation or delivery to any
person in this state.

(xii) "Consumer" means any person who purchases,
has title to or has possession of nicotine products in this
state that are purchased or held in storage for the
person's own use or consumption and not for resale;

(xiii) "Pipe tobacco" means any tobacco that,
because of its appearance, type, packaging or labeling, is
suitable for use and likely to be offered to, or purchased
by, consumers as tobacco to be smoked in a pipe;

(xiv) "Remote retail sale" means any sale of
cigars or pipe tobacco to a consumer in this state when:

(A) The consumer submits the order for the
purchase by means of a telephone or other method of voice
transmission, mail or electronically over the internet or
other online service, or when the seller is otherwise not
SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
in the physical presence of the consumer when the order or
purchase is made; or

(B) Cigars or pipe tobacco are delivered to
the consumer by common carrier, private delivery service or
other method of remote delivery, or the seller is not in
the physical presence of the consumer when the consumer
obtains possession of the cigars or pipe tobacco.

(xv) "Remote retail seller" means any person who
makes remote retail sales to consumers in Wyoming that
exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) in gross
revenue in the applicable calendar year or in the
immediately preceding calendar year.

39-18-103. Imposition.

(a) Taxable event. The following event events shall
constitute a taxable event under this article. This article
shall be administered to ensure that the applicable tax
under this article is paid on each nicotine product and
that no nicotine product is taxed more than one (1) time:

SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
(iii) In addition to the other taxes imposed by
this subsection, there is levied and assessed upon cigars,
snuff and other tobacco products purchased or imported into
this state by wholesalers for sale or resale, except
cigarettes taxed under this subsection, an excise tax at
the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(c) or (e), as
applicable;

(iv) The tax imposed by paragraph (iii) of this
subsection shall also be imposed upon:

(A) The use or storage by consumers of
cigars, snuff and other tobacco products in this state, and
upon those consumers, at the rate imposed by W.S.
39-18-104(d) or (f) 39-18-104(d)(i) or (f), as applicable.
This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by paragraph
(iii) of this subsection or the tax imposed by subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph has been paid;

(B) A remote retail sale of cigars or pipe
tobacco by a wholesaler to consumers in this state at the
rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(d)(ii). This tax shall not
SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
apply if the tax imposed by paragraph (iii) of this
subsection has been paid.

(v) In addition to the other taxes imposed by
this subsection, there is levied and assessed upon
electronic cigarettes and vapor material purchased or
imported into this state by wholesalers for sale or resale
an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(g);

(c) Taxpayer. The following taxpayers are liable for
the tax imposed by this article:

(iii) In addition to the other taxes imposed by
this subsection, there is levied and assessed upon cigars,
snuff and other tobacco products purchased or imported into
this state by wholesalers for sale or resale, except
cigarettes taxed under this subsection, an excise tax at
the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(c) or (e), as
applicable;

(iv) The tax imposed by paragraph (iii) of this
subsection shall also be imposed upon:

SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
(A) The use or storage by consumers of
cigars, snuff and other tobacco products in this state, and
upon those consumers, at the rate imposed by W.S.
39-18-104(d) or (f) 39-18-104(d)(i) or (f), as applicable.
This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by paragraph
(iii) of this subsection or the tax imposed by subparagraph
(B) of this paragraph has been paid;

(B) A remote retail sale of cigars or pipe
tobacco by a wholesaler to consumers in this state at the
rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(d)(ii). This tax shall not
apply if the tax imposed by paragraph (iii) of this
subsection has been paid.

(v) In addition to the other taxes imposed by
this subsection, there is levied and assessed upon
electronic cigarettes and vapor material purchased or
imported into this state by wholesalers for sale or resale
an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(g);

39-18-104. Taxation rate.

SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
(c) In addition to the other taxes imposed by this
section, there is levied and assessed upon cigars, snuff
and other tobacco products purchased or imported into this
state by wholesalers for sale or resale, except cigarettes
and moist snuff taxed under this section, an excise tax at
the rate of twenty percent (20%) of the wholesale purchase
price at which the tobacco products are purchased by
wholesalers from manufacturers. The tax under this
subsection shall not exceed thirty cents ($0.30) per cigar.

(d) The tax imposed by subsection (c) of this section
shall also be imposed upon:

(i) The use or storage by consumers of cigars,
snuff and other tobacco products other than cigarettes and
moist snuff in this state, and upon those consumers, at the
rate of ten percent (10%) of the retail price of the cigar,
snuff or other tobacco product other than cigarettes and
moist snuff. The tax under this paragraph shall not exceed
thirty cents ($0.30) per cigar. This tax shall not apply if
the tax imposed by subsection (c) of this section or the
tax imposed by paragraph (ii) of this subsection has been
paid;.
SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476

(ii) A remote retail sale of cigars or pipe
tobacco by a wholesaler to consumers in this state, at the
rate of twenty percent (20%) of the wholesale purchase
price. The tax under this paragraph shall not exceed thirty
cents ($0.30) per cigar. The wholesaler shall be liable for
the tax under this paragraph. This tax shall not apply if
the tax imposed by subsection (c) of this section has been
paid.

(e) In addition to the other taxes imposed by this
section, there is levied and assessed upon moist snuff
purchased or imported into this state by wholesalers for
sale or resale, an excise tax at the rate of sixty cents
($0.60) for any amount of moist snuff up to one (1) ounce
plus a proportionate tax at the like rate on any fractional
parts of more than one (1) ounce. The tax on moist snuff
shall be imposed based on the net weight as listed by the
manufacturer.

(g) In addition to the other taxes imposed by this
section, there is levied and assessed upon electronic
cigarettes and vapor material purchased or imported into
SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
this state by wholesalers for sale or resale, an excise tax
at the rate of fifteen percent (15%) of the wholesale
purchase price at which the electronic cigarettes and vapor
material are purchased by wholesalers from manufacturers.

39-18-106. Licensing; permits.

(a) Every wholesaler, including a remote retail
seller, and every cigarette importer and cigarette
manufacturer who sells or offers to sell nicotine products
in this state must have a license to do so issued by the
department. No license or renewal of a license shall be
granted under this section unless the wholesaler states in
writing, under penalty for false swearing, that he shall
comply fully with W.S. 9-4-1201 through 9-4-1209. The
license fee is ten dollars ($10.00) per year or fraction
thereof and is valid through June 30 in each year. The
license will be granted only to wholesalers who own or
operate the place from which sales are made and additional
licenses must be obtained for each separate location. The
licenses are transferable pursuant to rules and regulations
promulgated by the department.

SF0096

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0476
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0096